Tennessee, session 114, HB1259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 69-3-104(d), is amended by deleting
"five (5) days" and substituting "seven (7) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1259
002604
- 1 -